Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1391.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 17509(b), (d)(1) introductory paragraph and (2) and (f)(1)(i) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended, subsection (d)(1) is amended by adding a subparagraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 17509. Hotel room rental tax in second class and second class A counties.* * *[(b) Collection, deposit and distribution for county of the second class.--The treasurer of each county of the second class electing to impose the tax authorized under this section is directed to collect the tax and to deposit the revenue received from the tax in a special fund. The revenues shall be 123456789101112131415161718 distributed by the county commissioners as follows:(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (5), two-fifths of the revenue received by the county from the excise tax shall be distributed to a tourist promotion agency pursuant to section 2199.14 of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code.(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (5), one-third of the tax collected by hotels within a municipality where a convention center or exhibition hall is located, less the cost of collecting the tax shall, at the request of that municipality, be returned to that municipality for deposit in that municipality's special fund established solely for purposes of paying for promotional programs implemented by a nonprofit organization which are designed to stimulate and increase the volume of conventions and visitors within the municipality or as provided in paragraph (7), subject to the following requirements:(i) An audited report on the income and expenditures incurred by the municipality receiving funds from the excise tax on hotel room rentals shall be made annually to the county.(ii) The members of the board of directors or other governing body of the nonprofit organization utilized by the municipality to provide the promotional programs shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality.(3) Except as set forth in paragraph (5), a 5% fee shall be paid to the county for collecting the tax.(4) Except as set forth in paragraph (5), all remaining revenue from the tax received by the county, after paying the 20260SB1391PN1850 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amounts set forth in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), shall be used for operational and maintenance expenditures of the convention center or exhibition hall as provided in subsection (d) and for regional tourist promotion activities.(5) Subject to paragraph (6), if bonds are issued by the public authority to provide permanent financing or refinancing of the expansion of and capital improvements to the convention center or exhibition hall, the revenue received from the tax and deposited in the special fund shall not be distributed as set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) but shall be distributed by the county commissioners in the order of priority as follows:(i) First, to the payment of all amounts set forth in paragraph (2).(ii) Second:(A) to the trustee for the bonds in accordance with the provisions of the indenture pursuant to which the bonds are issued, to be used for the payment of debt service on the bonds; and(B) to the payment of all amounts set forth in paragraph (3):(I) in full; or(II) if the revenues are insufficient to make the payment in full, pro rata.(iii) Third, to the payment of all amounts set forth in paragraph (1).(iv) Fourth, as set forth in paragraph (4).(6) Paragraph (5) shall not apply to bonds issued subsequent to the permanent financing for purposes of completion or subsequent expansions or capital improvements.20260SB1391PN1850 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) If a convention center or exhibition hall discontinues operation in a municipality in which a convention center or exhibition hall is located, the municipality shall continue to collect and receive the tax, which shall be deposited by the municipality and used for the purposes as provided in paragraph (2).](b.1) Collection, deposit and distribution for county of the second class.--The treasurer of each county of the second class electing to impose the tax authorized under this section is directed to collect the tax and to deposit the revenue received from the tax into a special fund. The revenues shall be distributed by the county commissioners as follows:(1) One-third of the tax collected by hotels within a municipality where a convention center or exhibition hall is located, less the cost of collecting the tax, shall, at the request of that municipality, be returned to that municipality for deposit into that municipality's special fund established solely for purposes of paying for promotional programs implemented by a nonprofit organization which are designed to stimulate and increase the volume of conventions and visitors within the municipality or as provided in paragraph (6), subject to the following requirements:(i) An audited report on the income and expenditures incurred by the municipality receiving funds from the excise tax on hotel room rentals shall be made annually to the county.(ii) The members of the board of directors or other governing body of the nonprofit organization utilized by the municipality to provide the promotional programs 20260SB1391PN1850 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality.(2) (i) To the trustee for any bonds issued by an authority created pursuant to the act of July 29, 1953 (P.L.1034, No.270), known as the Public Auditorium Authorities Law, in accordance with the provisions of the indenture or indentures pursuant to which the bonds are issued, to be used for the payment of debt service on the bonds and other amounts payable in connection with the bonds.(ii) To the payment of all amounts under paragraph (4):(A) in full; or(B) if the revenues are insufficient to make the payment in full, pro rata.(3) To the extent that no bonds are outstanding under paragraph (2)(i), 45% of the revenue received by the county from the excise tax shall be allocated to an authority created pursuant to the Public Auditorium Authorities Law for:(i) expanding and improving the convention center or exhibition hall and realty appurtenant to the premises as provided in subsection (d); and(ii) operational and maintenance expenditures of the convention center or exhibition hall as provided in subsection (d), and allocated on parity with the payment of all amounts under paragraph (4):(A) in full; or(B) if the revenues are insufficient to make the payment in full, pro rata.20260SB1391PN1850 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A 5% fee shall be paid to the county for collecting the tax.(5) Two-fifths of the revenue received by the county from the excise tax shall be distributed to a tourist promotion agency pursuant to section 2199.14 of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code.(6) All remaining revenue from the tax received by the county, after paying the amounts under paragraphs (1), (2), (4) and (5), shall be used for operational and maintenance expenditures of the convention center or exhibition hall as provided in subsection (d) and for regional tourist promotion activities.(7) If a convention center or exhibition hall discontinues operation in a municipality in which a convention center or exhibition hall is located, the municipality shall continue to collect and receive the tax, which shall be deposited by the municipality and used for the purposes as provided in paragraph (1).* * *(d) Limitation on use of fund for counties of the second class.--The following shall apply:(1) In counties of the second class, expenditures from the fund established under subsection [(b)] (b.1) shall be used for all purposes which a public authority may determine to be reasonably necessary to the support, operation and maintenance of a convention center or exhibition hall, including the following:* * *(ix) Expanding and improving the convention center 20260SB1391PN1850 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or exhibition hall and realty appurtenant to the premises.(2) It is the intention of this subsection that the receipts from any tax imposed under this section after payment of the distributions under subsection [(b)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (5)] (b.1)(1), (2), (4), (5) and (6) be used in the county to offset the entire operating deficit, if any, of any convention center or exhibition hall, including equally, shares of any cooperating political subdivision or agency of government incurred pursuant to any agreement. The operating deficit shall be determined by the public authority which is the designated operating agency of the convention center or exhibition hall.* * *(f) Duration of section.--The following shall apply:(1) The provisions of this section relating to counties of the second class shall remain in force from year to year. The following apply:(i) Revenue in excess of amounts needed to pay the distributions under subsection [(b)(1), (2), (3) and (4)] (b.1)(1), (2), (4), (5) and (6) and to offset operating deficits under subsections [(b)(3)] (b.1)(4) and (d) shall be determined by the public authority and may be accumulated.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1391PN1850 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526